Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-621
Society names and emblems; registration; certificate to issue.

Upon granting registration as aforesaid, the Secretary of State shall issue his certificate to the petitioners, setting forth the fact of such registration.

Laws 1929, c. 140, § 5, p. 497;

C.S.1929, § 24-618;

R.S.1943, § 21-621.